Georgia statutes. TITLE 30 Handicapped Persons
CHAPTER 6 Personal Assistance Program for Persons with Disabilities

Cross references.

Probationers as live-in attendants for disabled persons, § 42-8-72.

30-6-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Personal Assistance Program for Persons With Disabilities Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

30-6-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 1355, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 399, § 1.

30-6-2.
Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to allow persons with severe disabilities to live as self-sufficiently as possible.

History.

Code 1981, §

30-6-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 1355, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 399, § 1.

30-6-3.
“Personal assistance” defined.

As used in this chapter, the term “personal assistance” means assistance which is required by a person with severe disabilities to achieve greater independence and which includes, but is not limited to, assistance with:

Routine bodily functions such as bowel or bladder care;

Dressing;

Household management, including, but not limited to, housecleaning and personal correspondence;

Preparation and consumption of food;

Moving in and out of bed;

Routine bathing;

Transportation, community errands, and activities; and

Any other similar activity of daily living.

History.

Code 1981, §

30-6-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 1355, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 399, § 1.

30-6-4.
Authority of Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency to establish program.

The Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency is authorized to establish a personal assistance program for persons with severe disabilities residing in the State of Georgia.

History.

Code 1981, §

30-6-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 1355, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 399, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1137, § 3; Ga. L. 2012, p. 303, § 3/HB 1146.

30-6-5.
Establishment of standards and guidelines.

The Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency, in conjunction with the Statewide Independent Living Council and other appointed users of personal assistance, shall develop standards necessary for the proper administration of the personal assistance program and shall establish guidelines for eligibility, services, training, and evaluation under the program.

History.

Code 1981, §

30-6-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 1355, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 399, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1137, § 3; Ga. L. 2012, p. 303, § 3/HB 1146.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1137, § 3 amended Code Section 30-6-5, however, the amendment to Code Section 30-6-5 was intended to be made by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1137, § 2.